District of Columbia statutes.
20-356

Applicability of other provisions of title.

Except to the extent inconsistent with this subchapter, all the other provisions of this title shall apply to small estates.

History

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-356.